Colorado, session 2026A, SB087.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 2-2-328 as
follows:
2-2-328. Legislative leave and job protection during legislative
session - exception - legislative intent - definitions - repeal.
(1) Legislative intent.
(a) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(I) A REPRESENTATIVE DEMOCRACY FUNCTIONS BEST WHEN THE
MEMBERSHIP OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY REFLECTS THE ECONOMIC,
PROFESSIONAL, AND SOCIAL DIVERSITY OF THE PEOPLE IT SERVES;
(II) SERVICE IN THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY IS COMPENSATED AT A
LEVEL THAT DOES NOT, ON ITS OWN, PROVIDE A LIVABLE INCOME FOR
MANY RESIDENTS OF THE STATE;
(III) AS A RESULT OF LOW LEGISLATIVE COMPENSATION AND THE
DEMANDS OF LEGISLATIVE SERVICE, QUALIFIED INDIVIDUALS,
PARTICULARLY MEMBERS OF THE WORKING CLASS, CAREGIVERS, PUBLIC
SERVICE EMPLOYEES, AND THOSE IN NONTRADITIONAL OR HOURLY
PROFESSIONS, ARE OFTEN EFFECTIVELY EXCLUDED FROM SEEKING OR
HOLDING LEGISLATIVE OFFICE;
-2- 087

(IV) THE ABILITY OF MEMBERS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO
MAINTAIN OUTSIDE, NONLEGISLATIVE EMPLOYMENT IS ESSENTIAL TO
ENSURING THAT LEGISLATIVE SERVICE REMAINS ACCESSIBLE TO
INDIVIDUALS FROM DIVERSE ECONOMIC, SOCIAL, AND CULTURAL
BACKGROUNDS;
(V) DURING LEGISLATIVE SESSIONS, MEMBERS MAY FACE LOSS OF
EMPLOYMENT, INCOME, OR PROFESSIONAL STANDING DUE TO ABSENCES
REQUIRED FOR THE PERFORMANCE OF THEIR OFFICIAL LEGISLATIVE DUTIES;
(VI) PROTECTING MEMBERS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FROM
ADVERSE EMPLOYMENT ACTIONS BY NONLEGISLATIVE EMPLOYERS DURING
PERIODS OF LEGISLATIVE SESSION SERVES A COMPELLING PUBLIC INTEREST
BY REMOVING STRUCTURAL BARRIERS TO PUBLIC SERVICE; AND
(VII) SUCH PROTECTIONS PROMOTE BROADER PARTICIPATION IN
GOVERNMENT, REDUCE ECONOMIC BARRIERS TO CANDIDACY AND SERVICE,
AND STRENGTHEN PUBLIC CONFIDENCE IN THE LEGITIMACY AND
REPRESENTATIVENESS OF THE LEGISLATIVE PROCESS.
(b) IT IS THEREFORE THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO
SAFEGUARD THE RIGHT OF THE MEMBERS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO
ENGAGE IN LAWFUL, NONLEGISLATIVE EMPLOYMENT WHILE SERVING IN
OFFICE AND TO PROTECT SUCH MEMBERS FROM DISCRIMINATION,
RETALIATION, OR TERMINATION BY OUTSIDE EMPLOYERS DUE TO
ATTENDANCE OR PARTICIPATION IN LEGISLATIVE SESSIONS.
(2) Definitions. AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(a) "AREA MEDIAN INCOME" MEANS THE MEDIAN INCOME OF THE
COUNTY IN WHICH A MEMBER LIVES WHEN THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY IS NOT
IN SESSION, IN RELATION TO HOUSEHOLD SIZE, AS ESTABLISHED ANNUALLY
-3- 087

BY THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN
DEVELOPMENT.
(b) "LEGISLATIVE LEAVE" MEANS A LEAVE OF ABSENCE A
QUALIFIED MEMBER IS ENTITLED TO TAKE FROM THEIR OUTSIDE
EMPLOYMENT PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(c) "MEMBER" MEANS A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(d) "OUTSIDE EMPLOYER" MEANS THE EMPLOYER OF A MEMBER'S
OUTSIDE EMPLOYMENT.
(e) "OUTSIDE EMPLOYMENT" MEANS A JOB OR EMPLOYMENT THAT
IS NOT OF A TEMPORARY NATURE THAT A MEMBER IS ENGAGED IN OUTSIDE
OF THE MEMBER'S DUTIES RELATED TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(f) (I) "QUALIFIED MEMBER" MEANS A MEMBER WHO QUALIFIES TO
TAKE LEGISLATIVE LEAVE.
(II) TO QUALIFY FOR LEGISLATIVE LEAVE, A MEMBER MUST NOT
HAVE AN ANNUAL INDIVIDUAL OR HOUSEHOLD INCOME THAT EXCEEDS ONE
HUNDRED TWENTY PERCENT OF THE AREA MEDIAN INCOME.
(3) (a) BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2027, A QUALIFIED MEMBER
WHO IS ENGAGED IN OUTSIDE EMPLOYMENT IS ENTITLED TO TAKE
LEGISLATIVE LEAVE FROM THEIR OUTSIDE EMPLOYMENT TO FULFILL THE
DUTIES OF A LEGISLATOR.
(b) LEGISLATIVE LEAVE:
(I) MUST ONLY LAST FOR THE DURATION THAT THE QUALIFIED
MEMBER IS PARTICIPATING IN EITHER A REGULAR OR EXTRAORDINARY
SESSION OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY; AND
(II) MAY BE PAID, UNPAID, OR PARTIALLY PAID AT THE DISCRETION
OF THE QUALIFIED MEMBER'S OUTSIDE EMPLOYER.
(4) A QUALIFIED MEMBER WHO PLANS TO TAKE LEGISLATIVE
-4- 087

LEAVE SHALL GIVE THEIR OUTSIDE EMPLOYER WRITTEN NOTICE OF THEIR
INTENT TO TAKE LEGISLATIVE LEAVE:
(a) NO LATER THAN THIRTY DAYS BEFORE THE BEGINNING OF A
REGULAR SESSION OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY; AND
(b) AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE BEFORE THE BEGINNING OF AN
EXTRAORDINARY SESSION OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(5) (a) AN OUTSIDE EMPLOYER SHALL NOT TERMINATE A
QUALIFIED MEMBER'S OUTSIDE EMPLOYMENT ON THE BASIS THAT THE
QUALIFIED MEMBER REQUESTS OR TAKES LEGISLATIVE LEAVE.
(b) UPON RETURN TO THEIR OUTSIDE EMPLOYMENT FOLLOWING
LEGISLATIVE LEAVE, A QUALIFIED MEMBER IS ENTITLED TO BE RESTORED
TO THE SAME OR AN EQUIVALENT EMPLOYMENT POSITION WITH
EQUIVALENT BENEFITS, SENIORITY, PAY, AND OTHER TERMS AND
CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT. NOTHING IN THIS SECTION ENTITLES THE
QUALIFIED MEMBER TO:
(I) THE ACCRUAL OF ANY SENIORITY OR OTHER OUTSIDE
EMPLOYMENT BENEFITS, INCLUDING SICK AND ANNUAL LEAVE, DURING
LEGISLATIVE LEAVE; OR
(II) ANY RIGHT, BENEFIT, OR POSITION OF EMPLOYMENT OTHER
THAN THAT WHICH THE QUALIFIED MEMBER WOULD HAVE BEEN ENTITLED
TO HAD THE MEMBER NOT TAKEN LEGISLATIVE LEAVE.
(6) THIS SECTION DOES NOT RELIEVE A QUALIFIED MEMBER WHO
TAKES LEGISLATIVE LEAVE PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION OF THE QUALIFIED
MEMBER'S CONSTITUTIONAL DUTY SET FORTH IN SECTION 2 OF ARTICLE XII
OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION.
(7) AN OUTSIDE EMPLOYER IS NOT SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION IF THE
OUTSIDE EMPLOYER MUST MAINTAIN THE NONPARTISAN ROLE OF THE
-5- 087

OUTSIDE EMPLOYER'S NONPARTISAN LEGISLATIVE, JUDICIAL, OR
ELECTION-RELATED STAFF.
(8) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (3)(a) OF THIS SECTION, A
QUALIFIED MEMBER WHO IS ACTIVELY SERVING A FOUR-YEAR TERM IN THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY AT THE TIME OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS
SECTION IS ONLY ELIGIBLE TO TAKE LEGISLATIVE LEAVE PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2029.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (8) IS REPEALED SEPTEMBER 1, 2029.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-50-104, add
(7)(e) as follows:
24-50-104. Job evaluation and compensation - state employee
reserve fund - created - study - report - definitions.
(7) Leaves - definition.
(e) (I) A QUALIFIED MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY IS
ENTITLED TO TAKE LEGISLATIVE LEAVE AS SPECIFIED IN SECTION 2-2-328.
(II) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (7)(e), UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES, "QUALIFIED MEMBER" HAS THE MEANING SET
FORTH IN SECTION 2-2-328 (2)(f).
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
-6- 087

November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-7- 087